Nebraska, session 109, LB755.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB755 LB755
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 5 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Emergency Service Peer Support Act.
Sec. 2. (1) The Legislature finds that it is common for employees
of emergency service agencies to experience stress and emotional
difficulties as a result of traumatic events experienced on a regular
basis. Peer support can be beneficial to emergency service employees and
can reduce the likelihood that such employees will experience long-term
effects that may have a negative impact on their employment.
(2) The Legislature further finds that confidentiality is a
necessary foundation of effective peer support. The privileged and
confidential nature of a peer support session ensures confidentiality and
encourages an employee to speak openly to a peer without fear that a
communication could be used against the employee in a disciplinary or
other hearing.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Emergency Service Peer Support Act:
(1) Employee means an individual employed by an emergency service
agency as a law enforcement officer, a firefighter, an emergency medical
service provider, a dispatcher, a correctional officer, a hospital staff
member, or a civilian staff member;
(2) Emergency service agency means a law enforcement agency, a fire
department, an emergency medical service, a correctional facility, a
hospital, a dispatch center, a rescue service, or another entity that
provides emergency response services;
(3) Peer means an individual approved by an emergency service agency
who has been trained in peer support techniques in compliance with the
agency's guidelines to provide emotional and moral support and who
provides confidential support and assistance to an employee experiencing
personal or professional issues. A peer may be a current employee, former
employee, or any other person approved by the emergency service agency;
(4) Peer support means a structured program in which a peer helps an
employee identify issues early, connects an employee to appropriate
-2-

LB755 LB755
2026 2026
resources, and fosters a supportive and healthy workforce. An employee
receives emotional, practical, and resource-based support from a peer.
Peer support is built upon shared-experience, confidentiality, active
listening, and early intervention to promote sound mental health and
resilience. Peer support may include a: (a) One-on-one interaction, (b)
crisis intervention, (c) critical incident defusing, (d) critical
incident stress management debriefing, (e) referral to an appropriate
resource such as a mental health clinician, a mental health treatment
center, or another emergency service agency, or (f) follow-up as needed.
Peer support is designed to ensure that no employee faces challenges
alone;
(5) Peer support session means a confidential communication between
an employee and a peer that occurs for the purpose of providing emotional
support, crisis intervention, or assistance related to personal or
professional challenges. A peer support session may occur within a formal
program established under the Emergency Service Peer Support Act or may
be an informal interaction between an employee and a peer approved by an
emergency service agency. A peer support session is accomplished
primarily through listening, assessing, assisting with problem solving,
making appropriate referrals to professional providers, and conducting
follow-up as needed. A peer support session may consist of a single
interaction or multiple interactions over a period of time. The
privileged and confidential status of communications made during a peer
support session shall continue indefinitely except as provided in section
4 of this act or if an employee expressly waives that privilege; and
(6) Program means a peer support program established or approved by
an emergency service agency to train an individual to serve as a peer and
to conduct peer support sessions.
Sec. 4. (1) A communication made by (a) an employee in a peer
support session and (b) a communication between a peer and a staff member
of a program shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed to any
-3-

LB755 LB755
2026 2026
person. This section does not prohibit a communication between peers or
between a peer and program staff in furtherance of the purpose of the
provision of peer support to an employee.
(2) A peer shall expressly indicate that a peer support session is
underway at the beginning of a peer support session prior to any
communication by an employee.
(3) A confidential communication pursuant to this act shall be
privileged and inadmissible as evidence in any civil, criminal,
administrative, or arbitration proceeding. No peer or program staff shall
be compelled to testify or produce records, notes, or documentation
concerning any peer support session in any proceeding, except as
otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section. Any notes, records,
or documentation created during, or related to, a peer support session
shall be confidential and not subject to discovery, subpoena, or other
legal means to compel disclosure.
(4) The confidentiality and privilege provisions of the Emergency
Service Peer Support Act shall not apply to: (a) A threat of future
suicide, homicide, or felonious assault made by an employee in a peer
support session or information conveyed in a peer support session related
to a threat of future suicide, homicide, or felonious assault; (b)
information mandated by law or agency policy to be reported, including,
but not limited to, information relating to domestic violence, sexual
assault, child abuse or neglect, or elder abuse or neglect; (c) an
admission of criminal conduct; or (d) an admission to an act that could
be construed as refusal to perform a duty to protect others.
(5) No individual who provides assistance to an employee as a peer
under the Emergency Service Peer Support Act shall be liable for any
civil damages as a result of an act of commission or omission arising
out, and in the course, of rendering such assistance in good faith or any
act or failure to act to provide or arrange for mental health treatment
or care for an employee.
-4-

LB755 LB755
2026 2026
(6) An emergency service agency that establishes a program shall
develop policies and rules that impose disciplinary measures upon a peer
who violates the confidentiality provisions of the Emergency Service Peer
Support Act.
(7) Records of communications made confidential under this section
shall be exempt from disclosure under sections 84-712 to 84-712.09.
Sec. 5. An emergency service agency may refer an employee to a peer
in the employee's emergency service agency or to a program available
through another emergency service agency. An employee may independently
seek peer support from a peer approved by any emergency service agency.
An emergency service agency shall not mandate that an employee
participate in a program.
-5-